Arkansas, session 2025, HB1491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 3, Chapter 7, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
3-7-117. Tax credit for beer and sake produced with Arkansas rice —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "qualified beer and sake" means beer and
sake that:
(1) Contains at least twenty percent (20%) Arkansas rice as
percentage weight of the total grain bill of the beer and sake; and
(2) Is subject to the excise tax levied by § 3-5-1205(3), § 3-5-
1408(3); or § 3-7-104(6)(A).
(b)(1) A person required to report and pay tax under § 3-5-1205(3), §
3-5-1408(3), or § 3-7-104(6)(A) for qualified beer and sake is entitled to a
credit against the excise tax.
*CEB144*
03-10-2025 10:51:11 CEB144

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1491
(2) The credit allowed under this section shall be:
(A) Calculated by multiplying the percentage weight of
Arkansas rice in the total grain bill of the qualified beer and sake by the
excise tax due for the qualified beer and sake for the reporting period under
§ 3-7-401; and
(B) Deducted from the excise tax due for the reporting
period under § 3-7-401.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-7-401(b), concerning the rules for
reporting the excise tax collected on beer, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The rules shall require:
(1) Require the reports to be filed with the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Division on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the
month in which the wholesaler acquired possession of or title to the beer. ;
and
(2) Provide a method of reporting and claiming a credit under §
3-7-117.

/s/Wardlaw

















03-10-2025 10:51:11 CEB144